extras/dictionaries/la.aff
SFX S Y 347
SFX S um      um              um        
SFX S um      urus            um        
SFX S um      ure             um        
SFX S um      uri             um        
SFX S um      uro             um        
SFX S um      ura             um        
SFX S um      uram            um        
SFX S um      urae            um        
SFX S um      uræ             um        
SFX S um      urum            um        
SFX S um      uros            um        
SFX S um      urorum          um        
SFX S um      uras            um        
SFX S um      urarum          um        
SFX S um      uris            um        
SFX S 0       que             um        
SFX S 0       ne              um        
SFX S 0       ve              um        
SFX S um      urusque         um        
SFX S um      urusne          um        
SFX S um      urusve          um        
SFX S um      ureque          um        
SFX S um      urene           um        
SFX S um      ureve           um        
SFX S um      urique          um        
SFX S um      urine           um        
SFX S um      urive           um        
SFX S um      uroque          um        
SFX S um      urone           um        
SFX S um      urove           um        
SFX S um      uraque          um        
SFX S um      urane           um        
SFX S um      urave           um        
SFX S um      uramque         um        
SFX S um      uramne          um        
SFX S um      uramve          um        
SFX S um      uraeque         um        
SFX S um      uraene          um        
SFX S um      uraeve          um        
SFX S um      uræque          um        
SFX S um      uræne           um        
SFX S um      uræve           um        
SFX S um      urumque         um        
SFX S um      urumne          um        
SFX S um      urumve          um        
SFX S um      urosque         um        
SFX S um      urosne          um        
SFX S um      urosve          um        
SFX S um      urorumque       um        
SFX S um      urorumne        um        
SFX S um      urorumve        um        
SFX S um      urasque         um        
SFX S um      urasne          um        
SFX S um      urasve          um        
SFX S um      urarumque       um        
SFX S um      urarumne        um        
SFX S um      urarumve        um        
SFX S um      urisque         um        
SFX S um      urisne          um        
SFX S um      urisve          um        
SFX S um      u               um        
SFX S um      uque            um        
SFX S um      une             um        
SFX S um      uve             um        
SFX S um      us              um        
SFX S um      e               um        
SFX S um      i               um        
SFX S um      o               um        
SFX S um      a               um        
SFX S um      am              um        
SFX S um      ae              um        
SFX S um      æ               um        
SFX S um      os              um        
SFX S um      orum            um        
SFX S um      is              um        
SFX S um      as              um        
SFX S um      arum            um        
SFX S um      usque           um        
SFX S um      usne            um        
SFX S um      usve            um        
SFX S um      eque            um        
SFX S um      ene             um        
SFX S um      eve             um        
SFX S um      ique            um        
SFX S um      ine             um        
SFX S um      ive             um        
SFX S um      oque            um        
SFX S um      one             um        
SFX S um      ove             um        
SFX S um      aque            um        
SFX S um      ane             um        
SFX S um      ave             um        
SFX S um      amque           um        
SFX S um      amne            um        
SFX S um      amve            um        
SFX S um      aeque           um        
SFX S um      aene            um        
SFX S um      aeve            um        
SFX S um      æque            um        
SFX S um      æne             um        
SFX S um      æve             um        
SFX S um      umque           um        
SFX S um      umne            um        
SFX S um      umve            um        
SFX S um      osque           um        
SFX S um      osne            um        
SFX S um      osve            um        
SFX S um      orumque         um        
SFX S um      orumne          um        
SFX S um      orumve          um        
SFX S um      isque           um        
SFX S um      isne            um        
SFX S um      isve            um        
SFX S um      asque           um        
SFX S um      asne            um        
SFX S um      asve            um        
SFX S um      arumque         um        
SFX S um      arumne          um        
SFX S um      arumve          um        
SFX S us      us              us        
SFX S us      urus            us        
SFX S us      ure             us        
SFX S us      uri             us        
SFX S us      uro             us        
SFX S us      ura             us        
SFX S us      uram            us        
SFX S us      urae            us        
SFX S us      uræ             us        
SFX S us      urum            us        
SFX S us      uros            us        
SFX S us      urorum          us        
SFX S us      uras            us        
SFX S us      urarum          us        
SFX S us      uris            us        
SFX S us      urusque         us        
SFX S us      urusne          us        
SFX S us      urusve          us        
SFX S us      ureque          us        
SFX S us      urene           us        
SFX S us      ureve           us        
SFX S us      urique          us        
SFX S us      urine           us        
SFX S us      urive           us        
SFX S us      uroque          us        
SFX S us      urone           us        
SFX S us      urove           us        
SFX S us      uraque          us        
SFX S us      urane           us        
SFX S us      urave           us        
SFX S us      uramque         us        
SFX S us      uramne          us        
SFX S us      uramve          us        
SFX S us      uraeque         us        
SFX S us      uraene          us        
SFX S us      uraeve          us        
SFX S us      urumque         us        
SFX S us      urumne          us        
SFX S us      urumve          us        
SFX S us      urosque         us        
SFX S us      urosne          us        
SFX S us      urosve          us        
SFX S us      urorumque       us        
SFX S us      urorumne        us        
SFX S us      urorumve        us        
SFX S us      urasque         us        
SFX S us      urasne          us        
SFX S us      urasve          us        
SFX S us      urarumque       us        
SFX S us      urarumne        us        
SFX S us      urarumve        us        
SFX S us      urisque         us        
SFX S us      urisne          us        
SFX S us      urisve          us        
SFX S us      u               us        
SFX S us      uque            us        
SFX S us      une             us        
SFX S us      uve             us        
SFX S us      um              us        
SFX S us      e               us        
SFX S us      i               us        
SFX S us      o               us        
SFX S us      a               us        
SFX S us      am              us        
SFX S us      ae              us        
SFX S us      os              us        
SFX S us      orum            us        
SFX S us      is              us        
SFX S us      as              us        
SFX S us      arum            us        
SFX S 0       que             us        
SFX S 0       ne              us        
SFX S 0       ve              us        
SFX S us      umque           us        
SFX S us      umne            us        
