extras/dictionaries/la.dic
abiurgo/AS
abrelego/APS
absumptum/S
accultum/S
acutum/S
addictum/S
adfirmo/APS
adgravo/APS
adiuro/APS
adloquutum/S
admurmuratus/S
adordino/APS
adpostulo/APS
adrosum/S
adsessum/S
adsuefactum/S
adtentum/S
advecto/APS
advolutum/S
affectatus/S
aggeniculatus/S
albo/APS
allucinatus/S
ambulo/APS
amplexatus/S
annihilo/APS
antegressus/S
apparo/APS
appretio/APS
arsurus/S
arreptum/S
asperno/APS
asservo/APS
assumptum/S
attenuo/APS
auctionatum/S
ausculatus/S
balbutitum/S
benifactum/S
brevio/APS
calculatum/S
cantum/S
cariturus/S
celo/APS
charmidatus/S
circumcisum/S
circumfluxum/S
circummoenitus/S
circumsono/AS
circumversum/S
claudico/APS
coalitum/S
coercitum/S
coemptum/S
collitum/S
comissatus/S
commentatus/S
commissum/S
communicatus/S
compello/APS
completum/S
comprobo/APS
concelo/APS
concomitatus/S
concussum/S
confarreo/APS
conflictum/S
congestum/S
conlaudo/APS
conmaculo/APS
conminctum/S
conmonstro/APS
connoto/APS
conpertum/S
conporto/APS
conquietum/S
consano/APS
consecutum/S
conspectum/S
constructum/S
consydero/APS
contextum/S
contranisus/S
convadatus/S
convictum/S
copulatus/S
corrugo/APS
crepito/APS
cunctatum/S
deambulo/APS
decretum/S
decoctum/S
dedico/APS
defervefactum/S
defossum/S
defuso/APS
dehonesto/APS
delatro/APS
delimo/APS
demeritum/S
demoratus/S
denuptum/S
depulsum/S
deporto/APS
dequestus/S
descissum/S
desolutum/S
destitutum/S
determino/APS
detunsum/S
devirgino/APS
dilatum/S
dignotum/S
dimensus/S
diruptum/S
discordo/APS
dispalatus/S
dispestum/S
disseptum/S
dissulto/APS
distriguo/APS
divexo/APS
dominatus/S
duro/APS
ecflictum/S
edisserto/APS
effarsum/S
effugiturus/S
eiero/APS
elevo/APS
elocutum/S
emanco/APS
ementus/S
emulsum/S
enoto/APS
erasum/S
eruptum/S
evasum/S
evigilo/APS
exacutum/S
exantlo/APS
exbromo/APS
excerptum/S
excoctum/S
excussum/S
exerro/APS
exhibitum/S
existumo/APS
exorsus/S
expensum/S
explosum/S
expurigo/APS
exsequiatus/S
exsonitum/S
exstructum/S
extentum/S
extorno/APS
exulto/APS
fabritum/S
fascio/APS
latum/S
fictum/S
fluxum/S
fovo/APS
fruitus/S
funero/APS
genero/APS
glutitum/S
grunditum/S
hauscitum/S
horrifico/APS
ignitum/S
illumino/APS
immolo/APS
impetitum/S
imporco/APS
inauditum/S
inchoo/APS
increpatus/S
indauditum/S
induro/APS
infixum/S
infrigido/AS
inhibitum/S
inlaudo/APS
inmolo/APS
inocco/APS
inpinguo/APS
inpropero/APS
inrufo/APS
inseptum/S
insonitum/S
instaturus/S
integro/APS
interitum/S
interlisum/S
interpeditum/S
intersectum/S
intervulsum/S
introcessum/S
inundo/APS
involo/APS
irrufo/APS
iusto/AS
laeto/APS
lasso/APS
leno/AS
limo/APS
lorico/APS
luxo/APS
mancipo/APS
marmoro/APS
meritus/S
ministro/APS
missum/S
moratus/S
mussatus/S
neclectum/S
nitefactum/S
nuncio/APS
obclausum/S
obitum/S
obhaesum/S
oblocutus/S
obreptum/S
obsessum/S
obstructum/S
obtrunco/APS
occanto/APS
odoratus/S
ommotum/S
oppositum/S
oriturus/S
paco/APS
partum/S
pecco/APS
penetro/APS
percitum/S
perdeletum/S
peregrinatus/S
perforo/APS
periero/APS
permano/APS
pernocto/APS
perplexatus/S
perruptum/S
persessum/S
perstrictum/S
perterrefactum/S
perustum/S
pervolito/APS
pigratus/S
planctum/S
politum/S
postero/APS
praecarptum/S
praeconsumptum/S
praeelectum/S
praefotum/S
praeiectum/S
praemando/APS
praemorsum/S
praeoccupo/APS
praepotum/S
praesensum/S
praestitutum/S
praetentum/S
praeterlutum/S
praeustum/S
praevorsum/S
proclino/APS
productum/S
progestum/S
promersum/S
propago/APS
proquirito/APS
proserptum/S
protritum/S
proximo/APS
pustulo/APS
querelatus/S
ratiocinatus/S
recasurus/S
reconclusum/S
recuro/APS
redhibitum/S
refectum/S
refugitum/S
reintegro/APS
reluctatus/S
remollitum/S
renormo/APS
repensum/S
reprehensum/S
resalvo/APS
resolutum/S
resupino/APS
retracto/APS
retusum/S
revisum/S
roto/APS
sacrufico/APS
sano/APS
scandalizo/APS
scrutatus/S
semento/APS
sero/APS
sititum/S
sparsum/S
sputum/S
stomachatus/S
subcretum/S
subexplico/APS
subhasto/APS
sublectum/S
suborno/APS
subreptum/S
substratum/S
subtractum/S
succlamo/APS
suffossum/S
summersum/S
superexitum/S
superinlitum/S
supertextum/S
surreptum/S
tento/APS
tortum/S
transfusum/S
transspectum/S
triplo/AS
umecto/APS
variego/APS
versum/S
voco/APS
